Utah statutes.
53-2-105.   Hazardous materials emergency -- Recovery of expenses.
(1) (a)  The director may recover from those persons whose negligent actions
caused the hazardous materials emergency, expenses incurred by state agencies
directly associated with a response to a hazardous materials emergency taken
under authority of this part, Title 63K, Chapter 3, Emergency Management Act,
or Title 63K, Chapter 2, Disaster Response and Recovery.
(b)  The payment of expenses under this Subsection (1) does not constitute an
admission of liability or negligence in any legal action for damages.
(c)  The director may obtain assistance from the attorney general or a county
attorney of the affected jurisdiction to assist the director in recovering
expenses and legal fees.
(d)  Any recovered costs shall be deposited in the General Fund as dedicated
credits to be used by the division to reimburse state and local government
agencies for the costs they have incurred.
(2) (a)  If the cost directly associated with emergency response exceeds all
available funds of the division  within a given fiscal year, the division,
with approval from the governor, may incur a deficit in its line item budget.
(b)  The Legislature shall provide a supplemental appropriation in the
following year to cover the deficit.
(c)  The division shall deposit all costs associated with any emergency
response that are collected in subsequent fiscal years into the General Fund.
(3)  Any political subdivision may enact local ordinances pursuant to existing
statutory or constitutional authority to provide for the recovery of expenses
incurred by the political subdivision.
